src/fastspell_dictionaries/mag.dic
अँखुआ/194
अज्ञात/199
अनाथ/172
अस्तित्व/188
उत्साह/2,198
एकांकी/152
करना/196
कहथ/59,166
कहल/1,2,3,6,7,8,9,16,20,28,39,49,91,209
कहा/19,46,190
कहि/4,11,30,37,64,70,80,183
किसी/219
कुल/1,2,69
गइल/1,6,9,91,167
गीत/3,6,7,53
गेल/1,2,3,6,7,8,9,10,20,23,25,27,32,43,51,56,67,81,102,105
गोबर/1,240
गोल/2,3,17,33,170,254
गोसा/4,5,23,157,182
घुम/1,3,14,33,47,50,120,126,215
घोष/83
चलि/70
चाह/1,2,13,34,40,58,81,83,102,105,117,118,137,167
चुट/14,49,92,187,220
चुभ/4,164,184
चुह/5,189
चोट/125
छाँह/164
छिया/99
छुट/5,11,92,220
छोटकी/64
छोड़/25,86,176,243
जइती/88,107
जनता/9
जाड़/4
जान/3,5,25,28,42,47,224
जिले/186,216
जीत/1,3,6,8,10,11,17,29,52
जुआ/4,15,26,36,41
जुट/2,3,5,14,16,29,40,76,92,212,220
जुल/2,5,14,165,177
जेठ/7
जोग/2,113
जोह/170
झुक/3,5,7,8,12,13,21,26,29,76,100
टिकर/2,238
टुक/148,164
टुन/49
टोक/1,8,40
ठहर/47,100,171
डबडब/55
डुल/120
ढुक/4,5,21,34,126
ढेर/2,134
तका/206
ताल/176
तोंही/18
दफन/3,176
दरब/3,15,128
दहिन/1,3,39
दिल/1,2,3,7,32,42
दुलहा/124
देखत/25,89
देखा/4,10,11,20,23,77,95,227,235
देखि/16
देखे/18,222
देत/1,2,3,6,7,8,10,20,25,27,102,105
देल/1,2,3,6,7,8,9,25,43,56,67,102,105,162,212
देश/2,6,9,90,110
देह/1,2,3,7,8,12,40,71,130,167
दोकान/201
दोस/88,158
दौड़/16,76
धार/2,3,7,147
धोला/4,227
नहि/80
नाव/45
निकल/1,4,28,66,79,117,145
नोच/79
नोट/168
पइर/186
पच्छ/2,239
पड़िया/140
पड़ोस/72
पता/5,20
पथल/32
परम/59,223
परि/30,140,208
पहल/1,2,195
पहिल/1,2,3,28,39,49,58,210,225
पहुँच/1,3,5,10,50,58,78,125,126
पाल/6,12,34,40,241
पाव/1,146
पाह/2,166
पिअर/14,49
पिता/5,218
पिया/15,29,52
पिलल/1,253
पिला/38,70,232
पीला/19,31
पुर/32,150,187,206
पु्ष्पा/73
पूरब/2,3
पोत/2,3,5,177
पोर/3,4,133,134,168
पोस्ट/5
प्रचलन/109
प्रति/196
फरिया/5,116
फिर/4,21,22,66,119,161,255
फुट/128,137,159,182
फुला/4,23,70
फुसफुसा/5,16
फैल/1,3,5,14,21,171
बइठ/1,2,3,4,5,7,8,9,11,13,19,35,49,50,76,93,120,126
बइद/207
बकि/64
बटोर/4,180
बढ़ि/213
बता/4,35,37,81
बती/133
बदल/4,24,40,175
बना/4,5,15,19,21,23,38,65,66,77,197
बन्हा/4,31
बरद/36,127,244
बरस/1,3,4,24,130
बहर/2,55,58,60
बहा/4,19,46,52
बहि/15,24,29
बहिन/1,2,3,12,193
बहु/63
बाँट/1,2,4,5,16,24,54
बान्ह/1,12,24,34,52,86
बाबू/150
बाल/241
बिआह/29,40
बितल/1,129
बिहन/1,2,17,60,84,191,250
बिहा/6,36,236
बुझा/4,19,77,211
बुड़/3,50
बुतरू/6,121
बुन/13,51
बुरबक/182
बुल/1,3,4,5,9,246,255
बेगर/248
बेमार/1,2,58
बेर/2,17,252
बेल/1,2,3,4,37,42
बैठ/66,93,126
बोक/32,65
बोड/15
बोत/5,71,175
बोर/4,74,75,99
बोल/1,2,3,4,5,7,8,9,10,11,12,14,21,25,34,35,52,53,56,76,78,117,118,119,145,204,224
बोलल/105,243
भक्/134
भरइ/11,112
भरम/14,97
भरु/84
भार/2,11,204
भाषा/48
भुला/5,41,46,153
भोज/6,23,60
मंगल/169
मना/20,21,38,197
मरल/1,2,3,6,7,10,27,39,210
मरा/4,19,151
महादे/38
माँ/20,37,103
माट/2,87
मात/4,63
मान/1,2,4,5,22,25,38,234
मान्यता/9
माय/112
मार/1,2,3,4,5,8,10,12,13,20,40,138
मिल/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,10,11,12,13,16,19,20,21,22,24,29,75,100,118,137,138,145,243,245
मिलत/20,27
मुँहा/44
मुक/3,229
मुदा/214
मुसक/1,2,13,131
मूर्खता/114
मोंछ/3,32
मोट/14,36,39,113
मोह/6,12,15,55
रंग/5,6,11,29,42,82,93,201
रखल/54
रखे/85
रसोई/207
रहत/1,2,3,6,7,10,27,56,65,225
रहथ/59
रहल/1,2,3,6,7,8,10,20,27,28,67
रहि/6,64,70,183
राज/2,3,57,223
रात/106
रास/1,6,123
राह/103,229
रुक/1,3,8,12,13,20,24,29,111,137
रोक/1,8,11,13,16,23,24,34,40,79,245
रोप/4,5,26,30
रोवाई/200
लइका/153
लउटऽ/104
लगल/1,2,3,6,7,8,9,10,20,27,43,81
लगा/4,13,16,19,46,51,81,111,190
ललकार/4,13
लहलह/174
लाग/1,2,5,11,12,33
लाभ/7,48
लाल/2,88
लिखल/2,6,8,9,25,61,251
लुक/3,74,125,187
लेब/1,7,8,10,27
लेल/1,2,3,6,8,9,25,43,56,102,105,106
लेहु/213
लौट/4,13,43,47,146
वरे/149
वार/1,2,4,56
विता/6,217
विधा/6,22
विश्व/9,244
व्यवसाय/45
व्यापक/144
संसर/96
सकल/1,2,6,10,20,69
सकेर/1,62
सक्रि/23
सता/19,23,46,211
सतु/121
सना/4,41,115,117
सभके/44
समझ/3,5,24,34,42,43,47,50,78,119,246
सरक/4,127
सरो/152
ससुर/1,2,3,55,97,127
सहयोग/110
सहा/87
सहायक/205
सहे/15,22,52,90
साथ/1,2,28,72,162
साध/4,66,71
साम/4,11,66,75
सिया/6,15,98
सिरी/195
सिलउट/2
सुजा/22
सुत/1,3,4,5,8,13,19,23,28,47,111,155,234
सुन/1,5,11,13,14,16,28,43,47,51,78,119,120
सुर/33,165,226
सुरसा/230
सूखऽ/101,104
सेना/26,163
सेहत/139
सोच/1,4,21,26,47,54,78,79,86,118
सोझ/1,3,7,17,108,170
सोनल/173
सोलह/1,7
सोह/1,3,5,8,14,15,174
सौभाग/57
स्थान/94
हका/185
हजार/6,7,106
हठुआ/208
हमन्हि/233
हरदम/1,215
हरा/6,35,37
हहा/4,185
हाँ/148
हाह/254
हें/30
हेमान/191
होय/5,11,16,35,197
होस/159
